Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 2 Judicial Proceedings

386B.2-010.
Role of court in administration of trust.

The court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust’s administration, including a request for instructions, an action to declare rights, and an action to settle the trustee’s accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 13, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.2-020.
Jurisdiction over trustee and beneficiary.

By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this Commonwealth or by moving the principal place of administration to this Commonwealth, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this Commonwealth regarding any matter involving the trust.

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this Commonwealth are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this Commonwealth regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this Commonwealth regarding any matter involving the trust.

This section shall not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trustee, beneficiary, or other person receiving property from the trust, including trust registration under KRS

386B.2-050

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 14, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.2-030.
Subject-matter jurisdiction.

Except with regard to matters otherwise provided for by statute:

The District Court and Circuit Court shall have concurrent jurisdiction of any proceedings in this Commonwealth brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning any trust matter; and

If a proceeding is initially brought in District Court concerning any trust matter, the jurisdiction of the District Court shall become exclusive with respect to such matter unless, within twenty (20) days of receipt of notice of such proceeding, a party files an action in Circuit Court relating to the same trust matter, in which event the District Court shall be divested of jurisdiction and the Circuit Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over such action.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 15, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.2-040.
Venue.

Venue for proceedings under this chapter involving registered trusts is in the place of registration.

Venue for proceedings under this chapter involving trusts not registered in this Commonwealth is in any place where the trust properly could have been registered, and otherwise by the venue statutes of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 16, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.2-050.
Registration of trust.

The trustee of a trust having its principal place of administration in this Commonwealth shall register the trust in the District Court of this Commonwealth at the principal place of administration. Unless otherwise designated in the trust instrument, the principal place of administration of a trust is the trustee’s usual place of business where the records pertaining to the trust are kept, or at the trustee’s residence if he or she has no such place of business. In the case of cotrustees, the principal place of administration, if not otherwise designated in the trust instrument, is:

The usual place of business of the corporate trustee if there is but one (1) corporate cotrustee; or

The usual place of business or residence of the individual trustee who is a professional fiduciary if there is but one (1) such person and no corporate cotrustee; and

In all other cases, the usual place of business or residence of any of the cotrustees as agreed on by them.

The duty to register under this section shall not apply to the trustee of a trust if registration would be inconsistent with the retained jurisdiction of a foreign court from which the trustee cannot obtain release, nor does the duty to register under this section apply to any trust, whether testamentary or inter vivos, revocable or irrevocable, unless the settlor of the trust so directs.

Registration shall be accomplished by filing a statement indicating the name and address of the trustee in which he or she acknowledges the trusteeship. The statement shall indicate whether the trust has been registered elsewhere. The statement shall identify the trust:

In the case of a testamentary trust, by the name of the testator and the date and place of domiciliary probate;

In the case of a written inter vivos trust, by the name of each settlor and the original trustee and the date of the trust instrument; or

In the case of an oral trust, by information identifying the settlor or other source of funds and describing the time and manner of the trust’s creation and the terms of the trust, including the subject matter, beneficiaries, and time of performance.

If a trust has been registered elsewhere, registration in this Commonwealth is ineffective until the earlier registration is released by order of the court where prior registration occurred, or an instrument signed by the trustee and all beneficiaries is filed with the registration in this state.

By registering a trust, or accepting the trusteeship of a registered trust, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding under this chapter relating to the trust that may be initiated by any interested person while the trust remains registered. Notice of any proceeding shall be given pursuant to KRS

386B.1-070

.

To the extent of their interests in the trust, all beneficiaries of a trust properly registered in this Commonwealth are subject to the jurisdiction of the court of registration for the purposes of proceedings under this chapter, provided notice is given pursuant to KRS

386B.1-070

.

The court for good cause shown may provide for a different method or time of giving notice for any hearing.

A trustee who fails to register a trust in a proper place pursuant to this chapter, for purposes of any proceedings initiated by a beneficiary of the trust prior to registration, is subject to the personal jurisdiction of any court in which the trust could have been registered.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 17, effective July 15, 2014.